Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.32.040

Federal home loan bank as depositary.

Any such bank, insurance company, or association, may designate a federal home loan bank as a depositary for its funds.

[ 2014 c 37 s 203; 1955 c 33 s 30.32.040. Prior: 1933 c 105 s 3; RRS s 3294-3. Formerly RCW 30.32.040.]